Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,259
Windshield and windows; applicator; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who applies a sunscreening material or a glass-plastic glazing material in a manner which results in a motor vehicle having a window which violates the requirements prescribed in subsection (1) of section 60-6,257 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1989, LB 155, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,136.03;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 355.